Indiana, session 2026, HB1337.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-20.6-7.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 74, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 7.7. (a) This section
applies for property taxes first due and payable in calendar years
beginning after December 31, 2025.
(b) A person who qualifies for a standard deduction from the
assessed value of the person's homestead under IC 6-1.1-12-37 (or is
married at the time of death to a deceased spouse who qualifies for a
standard deduction under IC 6-1.1-12-37 for the person's homestead)
is also entitled to receive a supplemental homestead credit under this
section against the person's property tax liability on the same
homestead to which the standard deduction applies.
(c) The amount of the credit is equal to the lesser of:
(1) the result of:
(A) the property tax liability first due and payable on the
homestead property for the calendar year; multiplied by
(B) one-tenth (0.1); or
2026 IN 1337—LS 6592/DI 134


(2) three hundred dollars ($300).
(d) Property taxes imposed after being approved by the voters in a
referendum or local public question shall not be considered for
purposes of calculating a person's credit under this section.
(e) A person is not required to file an application for the credit
under this section. The county auditor shall:
(1) identify the property in the county eligible for the credit under
this section; and
(2) apply the credit under this section to property tax liability on
the identified property.
(f) Property taxes imposed:
(1) to pay debt service:
(A) on bonds issued before January 1, 2026; or
(B) on bonds that:
(i) are issued to refund bonds originally issued before
January 1, 2026; and
(ii) have a maturity date that is not later than the
maturity date of the bonds refunded;
(2) to make lease payments on leases entered into before
January 1, 2026, to secure bonds;
(3) to make lease payments on leases:
(A) that are amended to refund bonds secured by leases
entered into before January 1, 2026; and
(B) that have a term that is not longer than the term of the
leases amended; or
(4) to make lease payments on leases:
(A) that secure bonds:
(i) issued to refund bonds originally issued before
January 1, 2026; and
(ii) that have a maturity date that is not later than the
maturity date of the bonds refunded; and
(B) that have a term that ends not later than the maturity
date of the bonds refunded;
shall not be considered for purposes of calculating a person's credit
under this section.
SECTION 2. IC 6-3.6-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 118, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) This section applies to all
counties.
(b) The adopting body may by ordinance and subject to subsections
(c) through (e) impose one (1) or more of the following component
rates not to exceed a total expenditure tax rate under this chapter of two
2026 IN 1337—LS 6592/DI 134


and nine-tenths percent (2.9%) on the adjusted gross income of
taxpayers who reside in the county:
(1) A tax rate not to exceed one and two-tenths percent (1.2%) for
general purpose revenue for county services (as provided in
section 4 of this chapter), subject to subsection (c).
(2) A tax rate not to exceed four-tenths of one percent (0.4%) for
providers of fire protection and emergency medical services
located within the county (as provided in section 4.3 of this
chapter), subject to subsection (c).
(3) A tax rate not to exceed two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) for
general purpose revenue for distribution to nonmunicipal civil
taxing units (excluding fire protection districts) located within the
county (as provided in section 4.5 of this chapter), subject to
subsection (c).
(4) A tax rate not to exceed one and two-tenths percent (1.2%) for
general purpose revenue for municipal services for distribution to
municipalities located within the county that are not eligible to
adopt a municipal tax rate under section 22 of this chapter or that
have made an election under section 23(b)(3) of this chapter to be
treated as such.
(c) The combined component rates imposed by an adopting body
under subsection (b)(1) through (b)(3) shall not exceed one and
seven-tenths percent (1.7%).
(d) A tax rate adopted under subsection (b)(4) may only be imposed
on taxpayers who do not reside in a municipality that is eligible to
adopt a municipal tax rate under section 22 of this chapter.
(e) Beginning after December 31, 2030, A tax rate imposed under
subsection (b) shall expire expires on December 31, 2029, and on
December 31 of each every fourth calendar year thereafter. An
adopting body wishing to continue, increase, or decrease a tax rate in
for the succeeding four (4) year cycle must pass an ordinance to
readopt a tax rate in accordance with IC 6-3.6-3-3. This subsection
applies regardless of whether there is a modification in the tax rate or
the component rates or the rates are unchanged from the previous year.
SECTION 3. IC 6-3.6-6-22, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 147, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 22. (a) As used in this section,
"municipality" means only a city or town that:
(1) has a population of three thousand five hundred (3,500) or
more; and
(2) in the case of a city or town whose population decreased in the
most recent federal decennial census from three thousand five
2026 IN 1337—LS 6592/DI 134


hundred (3,500) or more to less than three thousand five hundred
(3,500), has elected by ordinance to continue to use its previous
population of three thousand five hundred (3,500) or more as set
forth in section 23(b)(2) of this chapter for purposes of the
allocation determination under section 6.1 of this chapter.
The term does not include a city or town that has made an election
under section 23(b)(3) of this chapter.
(b) Beginning after December 31, 2027, the fiscal body of a
municipality may by ordinance and subject to subsection (e), impose
a local income tax rate on the adjusted gross income of local taxpayers
in the municipality that does not exceed one and two-tenths percent
(1.2%).
(c) The following apply if a municipality imposes a local income tax
rate under this section:
(1) A local income tax rate imposed by a municipality under this
section applies only to local taxpayers within the territory of the
municipality.
(2) The local income tax is imposed in addition to a tax imposed
by the county in which the municipality is located in accordance
with IC 6-3.6-4-1(a) and IC 6-3.6-4-1(c).
(3) The following provisions of this article apply to a local income
tax rate imposed by a municipality under subsection (b):
(A) IC 6-3.6-3 (adoption of the tax), including the effective
date of an ordinance under IC 6-3.6-3-3.3.
(B) IC 6-3.6-4 (imposition of the tax), except that IC 6-3.6-4-2
and IC 6-3.6-4-3 do not apply.
(C) IC 6-3.6-8 (administration of the tax).
(4) A local income tax rate imposed by a municipality shall apply
to professional athletes who compete in the municipality, unless
exempted under IC 6-3-2-27.5 or other provision of law.
(d) The amount of the tax revenue that is from the local income tax
rate imposed under this section and that is collected for a calendar year
shall be treated as general purpose revenue and must be distributed to
the fiscal officer of the municipality that imposed the tax before July 1
of the next calendar year.
(e) Beginning after December 31, 2030, A tax rate imposed under
subsection (b) shall expire expires on December 31, 2029, and on
December 31 of each every fourth calendar year thereafter. A
municipality wishing to continue, increase, or decrease a tax rate in for
the succeeding four (4) year cycle must pass an ordinance to readopt
a tax rate in accordance with IC 6-3.6-3-3.3. This subsection applies
regardless of whether there is a modification in the tax rate or the rate
2026 IN 1337—LS 6592/DI 134


is unchanged from the previous year.
SECTION 4. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1337—LS 6592/DI 134